Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-15,248.01
Fee schedule.

The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to develop a fee schedule which covers direct and indirect costs to administer requirements related to private onsite wastewater treatment systems authorized by the Environmental Protection Act. Such costs include costs related to review of submitted plans and specifications, issuance of permits and approvals, proper operation and maintenance, development and enforcement of standards, closure, administration, investigation, inspection, and enforcement.

Laws 2007, LB333, § 5;

Laws 2016, LB328, § 3.

Environmental Protection Act, see section 81-1532.